it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda > Cura e pulitura strumenti a corda: Colofonia per archetto; Panni pulitura strumenti corda; Lucidatura strumenti a corda
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων > Φροντίδα & Καθαρισμός εγχόρδων οργάνων: Ρετσίνι δοξαριού; Πανιά καθαρισμού εγχόρδων οργάνων; Γυάλισμα εγχόρδων οργάνων
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente > Saiteninstrumentenpflege &-reinigung: Bogenharz; Reinigungstücher für Saiteninstrumente; Politur für Saiteninstrumente
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje > Starostlivosť a čistenie sláčikových nástrojov: Kolofónia; Čistiace utierky na sláčikové nástroje; Leštidlo na sláčikové nástroje
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda > Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de corda: Breu para arco; Tecidos para limpeza de instrumentos de corda; Polimento para instrumentos de corda
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument > Vård och rengöring av stränginstrument: Stråkharts; Rengöringsdukar för stränginstrument; Polermedel för stränginstrument
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği: Yay Reçinesi; Telli Çalgı Temizlik Bezleri; Telli Çalgı Parlatıcıları
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件 > 弦樂器清潔保養品: 琴弓松香; 弦樂器清潔布; 弦樂器擦拭用品
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala > Nega in čiščenje godal: Smola za loke; Krpe za čiščenje godal; Polirna sredstva za godala
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai > Styginių instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas: Strykų kanifolija; Styginių instrumentų valymo šluostės; Styginių instrumentų poliravimo priemonės
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strenginstrumenter – pleje og rengøring: Harpiks til bue; Strenginstrumenter – renseklude; Strenginstrumenter – pudsemiddel
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde > Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor cu coarde: Colofoniu pentru arcuș; Lavete pentru curățarea instrumentelor cu coarde; Substanță pentru lustruit instrumente cu coarde
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter > Pleie og rengjøring av strengeinstrumenter: Bueharpiks; Vaskekluter for strengeinstrumenter; Poleringsmidler for strengeinstrumenter
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องสาย: ยางสนขัดคันสี; ผ้าทำความสะอาดเครื่องสาย; ที่ขัดเงาเครื่องสาย
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten > Onderhoud en reiniging van snaarinstrumenten: Strijkstokhars; Schoonmaakdoeken voor snaarinstrumenten; Poetsmiddelen voor snaarinstrumenten
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품 > 현악기 관리/청소 용품: 로진; 현악기 청소 천; 현악기 광택제
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories > String Instrument Care & Cleaning: Bow Rosin; String Instrument Cleaning Cloths; String Instrument Polish
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品 > 弦楽器お手入れ用品: バイオリン用松脂; 弦楽器用クリーニングクロス; 弦楽器用ポリッシュ
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet > Jousisoitinten puhdistus ja huolto: Viuluhartsi; Jousisoitinten puhdistusliinat; Jousisoitinten kiillotus
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda > Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de cuerda: Resina para arcos; Gamuzas para instrumentos de cuerda; Cera para instrumentos de cuerda
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов > Чистка струнных инструментов и уход за ними: Канифоль для смычков; Ткань для чистки струнных инструментов; Средства для полировки струнных инструментов
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây > Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc nhạc cụ dây: Nhựa thông cho đàn; Vải lau nhạc cụ dây; Sơn nhạc cụ dây
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych > Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów strunowych: Kalafonia do smyczków; Środki czyszczące do instrumentów strunowych; Środki do polerowania instrumentów strunowych
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás: Vonógyanta; Vonóshangszer-tisztító ruhák; Vonóshangszer-fényezés
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件 > 弦乐器清洁保养: 松香; 弦乐器清洁布; 弦乐器抛光
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas > Limpeza e cuidado de instrumento de cordas: Resina para arco; Panos de limpeza para instrumento de cordas; Polimento para instrumento de cordas
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes > Entretien et nettoyage des instruments à cordes: Résine pour archet; Chiffons de nettoyage pour instruments à cordes; Cire d’entretien pour instruments à cordes
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala > Održavanje i čišćenje orkestralnih žičanih glazbala: Kolofonij za gudala; Krpice za čišćenje žičanih glazbala; Sredstvo za poliranje žičanih glazbala
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти > Грижа и почистване на струнни инструменти: Колофон за лък; Кърпи за почистване на струнни инструменти; Препарати за полиране на струнни инструменти
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství > Údržba a čištění strunných nástrojů: Smyčcová kalafuna; Čisticí utěrky na strunné nástroje; Leštidlo na strunné nástroje